Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 4 Jails and Jailers
41-4-140. Standards prescribed by the Tennessee corrections institute.

The Tennessee corrections institute has the power and duty to:

Establish minimum standards for local jails, lock-ups and workhouses, including, but not limited to, standards for physical facilities and standards for correctional programs of treatment, education and rehabilitation of inmates and standards for the safekeeping, health and welfare of inmates. The standards shall be established by the Tennessee corrections institute and shall approximate, insofar as possible, those standards established by the inspector of jails, federal bureau of prisons, and by the American Correctional Association's Manual of Correctional Standards, or such other similar publications as the institute deems necessary;

Establish guidelines for the security of local jails, lock-ups and workhouses for the purpose of protecting the public from criminals and suspected criminals by making the facilities more secure and thereby reducing the chances that a member of the public or a facility employee will be killed or injured during an escape attempt or while an inmate is fleeing from law enforcement officials following an escape;

Inspect all local jails, lock-ups, workhouses and detention facilities at least once a year and publish the results of the inspections. Inspections shall be based on the established standards mentioned in subdivision (a)(1); and

Have full authority to establish and enforce procedures to ensure compliance with the standards set out in subdivision (a)(1) so as to ensure the welfare of all persons committed to the institutions. Failure on the part of the county, municipality or political subdivision to maintain standards established under this section shall be reported by the board of control of the institute to the commissioner of correction, sheriff, judge, mayor or head of the political subdivision, as appropriate, in which the jail or penal institution is located. This report shall specify deficiencies and departures from the standards and order their correction. At the request of the commissioner, the institute may assist the department of correction in establishing standards for state institutions similar to the standards provided for in subdivision (a)(1).

If, after inspection of a local correctional facility as provided in subdivision (a)(3), the facility is determined not to be in compliance with the minimum standards, the board of control or any of its authorized staff may grant the facility an extension not to exceed sixty (60) days for the purpose of making such improvements as are necessary to bring the facility into compliance with the minimum standards. During the period of extension, the facility shall maintain the same certification status as it had prior to the most recent inspection. No additional extensions may be granted, and the certification status given a facility upon reinspection shall be the facility's status until the next annual inspection.

No local correctional facility shall be denied a certificate of compliance with the minimum standards for the sole purpose of calculating the level of reimbursement upon the certified or not certified determination, if the sole cause is based on overcrowding because of prisoners sentenced to the department whose commitments are delayed pursuant to chapter 1, part 5 of this title, or pursuant to a federal court order when such prisoners are being held by a county pending such commitment.

The minimum standards established pursuant to subsection (a) shall also apply to any jail, lock-up or workhouse used for the temporary housing or the incarceration of persons convicted or accused of a state or federal criminal offense that is owned or operated in this state by a private person or corporation.

The institute also has the duty to inspect, at least once a year, all the private jails, lock-ups and workhouses operating in this state that hold prisoners of any Tennessee jurisdiction in the same manner as is provided in subsection (a).

If, after inspection of a private correctional facility as provided in this section, the facility is determined not to be in compliance with the minimum standards, the board of control or any of its authorized staff may grant the facility an extension not to exceed sixty (60) days. If the facility is still not in compliance with the applicable standards, the operators of the facility shall be in violation of this section.

It is a Class A misdemeanor to operate a private correctional facility in violation of this section. If the operator of a private correctional facility is convicted of violating this subsection (c) and the owner of the facility is a person or corporation other than the operator, the owner shall be prohibited from holding any interest in a company or corporation that is engaged in this state in the temporary housing or the incarceration of persons convicted or accused of a state or federal criminal offense for a period of two (2) years.

This section shall not apply to a private correctional facility operated pursuant to chapter 24 of this title, nor to a contract with a political subdivision of the state.

No local currently certified facility shall be decertified if the local government has submitted a plan within sixty (60) days of the initial annual inspection that is reasonably expected to eliminate fixed ratio deficiencies in that facility and cause that facility to remain certified.

The total number of prisoners awaiting transfer to the department penal system shall be discounted from any computations used to determine compliance with standards used by the institute if the governor has invoked the power of delayed intake pursuant to § 41-1-504(a)(2), or a federal or state court has delayed intake into the department penal system, or both such events.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), any local correctional facility:

Shall meet the square footage requirements for single-occupancy or multi-occupancy cells contained in the minimum standards required by the Tennessee corrections institute that were in effect at the time of the construction of the facility; or

May elect to conform to a more recent minimum standards required by the American Correctional Association in order to accommodate a larger inmate population.

A local correctional facility constructed before the effective date of any minimum standards required by the Tennessee corrections institute shall be exempt from the square footage requirements described in this subsection (f), unless the exemption poses a serious life, safety, or security hazard as determined by the board of control of the Tennessee corrections institute.

Acts 1973, ch. 191, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; 1980, ch. 913, §§ 2-6; T.C.A., § 41-1144; Acts 1984, ch. 938, §§ 11-13; 1985, ch. 161, § 1; 1987, ch. 258, § 1; 1989, ch. 477, §§ 1-3; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1991, ch. 300, § 1; 1995, ch. 487, § 2; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 128-131; 2009, ch. 242, § 1; 2014, ch. 535, § 1.

Cross-References. Counselors of correctional institutions, qualifications, § 8-50-105.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Private prison contracting, title 41, ch. 24.

Attorney General Opinions. County jail inspectors, OAG 99-153, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 155 (8/16/99).

The Tennessee corrections institute does not have the authority to waive compliance with minimum jail standards other than in those specific situations outlined in this section, OAG 03-101, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (8/19/03).

T.C.A. § 41-4-140 requires the Tennessee corrections institute to inspect all local jails, lock-ups, workhouses, and detention facilities at least once a year, regardless whether those facilities house county prisoners, state prisoners, or both, and regardless whether those facilities are operated by private companies, OAG 04-026, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (2/12/04).

Square footage requirements for jail cells, OAG 09-018, 2009 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/25/09).

Changes to the Tennessee corrections institute's minimum standards for local correctional facilities. OAG 11-63, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 65 (8/26/11).

41-4-141. Interlocal agreements for joint operation of jails — Legislative intent — Allowable agreements.

It is the intent of the general assembly to allow interlocal agreements where two (2) or more counties jointly operate a jail. The general assembly finds that regional jails would allow counties to save funds and lower their liability risks.

Nothing in this chapter or any other provision of general law shall be construed to prevent two (2) or more counties from entering into an interlocal agreement for the joint operation of a jail to serve the counties so agreeing.

An interlocal agreement may specify that:

One (1) county actually operates the facility, but all participating counties equally share policy and decision-making responsibilities;

Adjoining counties may contract with a single county to house their prisoners and relinquish their authority regarding policy and decision-making; or

Each participating county operates its own facility for pretrial inmates, but joins with other counties for post-conviction incarcerations.

Acts 1999, ch. 190, § 3; 2005, ch. 187, § 1.

41-4-142. Charging inmates for issued items.

Any county or municipality may, by resolution or ordinance adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its legislative body, establish and implement a plan authorizing the jail or workhouse administrator of the county or municipality to charge an inmate committed to that jail or workhouse a fee, not to exceed the actual cost, for items issued to inmates upon each new admission to jail.

Any county or municipality may, by resolution or ordinance adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its legislative body, establish and implement a plan authorizing the jail or workhouse administrator of the county or municipality to charge an inmate committed to that jail or workhouse a nominal fee set by the legislative body at the time of adoption for the following special services, when provided at the inmate's request:

Participation in GED(R) or other scholastic testing for which the administering agency charges a fee for each test administered;

Escort by correctional officers to a hospital or other health care facility for the purpose of visiting an immediate family member who is a patient at the facility; or

Escort by correctional officers for the purpose of visiting a funeral home or church upon the death of an immediate family member.

A plan adopted pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) may authorize the jail or workhouse administrator to deduct the amount from the inmate's jail trust account or any other account or fund established by or for the benefit of the inmate while incarcerated. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing a county or municipality to deny necessary clothing or hygiene items or to fail to provide the services specified in subsection (b) based on the inmate's inability to pay a fee or costs.

Acts 1999, ch. 261, § 1; 2004, ch. 769, § 1.

Cross-References. Charges assessed against inmates for services provided by state, § 41-21-237.

Earnings of inmates deposited in trust accounts, establishment and payment of daily room and board rate, § 41-21-511.

Attorney General Opinions. Inmate funds established by or for the benefit of the inmate while incarcerated and not collected for governmental or public purposes are private funds rather than public funds, OAG 06-156, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (10/9/06).

41-4-143. Report on prisoners escaping from work details.

The sheriff shall within thirty (30) days report to the county legislative body and to the department of correction the name of any prisoner who escapes while serving on a work detail and shall indicate whether the work detail on which the prisoner was serving was supervised or unsupervised.

Acts 1986, ch. 744, § 27; T.C.A. § 41-8-117.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 41-8-117, concerning reports on prisoners escaping from work details, was transferred without change to this section by the code commission in 2006.

41-4-144. Jailer qualifications.

After July 1, 2006, any person employed as a jail administrator, jailer, corrections officer or guard in a county jail or workhouse shall:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Be a citizen of the United States;

Be a high school graduate or possess its equivalency, which shall include a general educational development (GED(R)) certificate;

Not have been convicted of, or pleaded guilty to, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to any felony charge or to any violation of any federal or state laws or municipal ordinances relating to force, violence, theft, dishonesty, gambling, liquor, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues;

Not have been released or discharged under any other than honorable discharge from any of the armed forces of the United States;

Have the person's fingerprints on file with the Tennessee bureau of investigation;

Have passed a physical examination by a licensed physician;

Have a good moral character as determined by a thorough investigation conducted by the sheriff's office; and

Have been certified by a Tennessee licensed health care provider qualified in the psychiatric or psychological field as being free from any impairment, as set forth in the current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM) of the American Psychiatric Association at the time of the examination, that would, in the professional judgment of the examiner, affect the person's ability to perform an essential function of the job, with or without a reasonable accommodation.

Requirements for minimum qualifications as set forth in subsection (a) shall be mandatory and binding upon any municipality, county or political subdivision of this state.

Any person who appoints any applicant who, to the knowledge of the appointor, fails to meet the minimum qualifications as set forth in subsection (a), and any person who signs the warrant or check for the payment of the salary of any person who, to the knowledge of the signer, fails to meet the minimum qualifications as set forth in this section, commits a Class A misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be subject to a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

This section shall not apply to any jail administrator, jailer, corrections officer or guard hired by any municipality, county, or political subdivision of this state prior to July 1, 2006.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude an employing agency from establishing qualifications and standards for hiring and training jail or workhouse employees that exceed those set forth in this section.

Acts 2006, ch. 849, § 1; 2012, ch. 848, § 38; 2013, ch. 173, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

41-4-131. Jailers' fees.